Washington statutes.
RCW 18.33.010

Definitions.

As used in this compact, unless the context requires otherwise, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) "Active military member" means any individual in full-time duty status in the armed forces of the United States including members of the national guard and reserve.

(2) "Adverse action" means disciplinary action or encumbrance imposed on a license or compact privilege by a state licensing authority.

(3) "Alternative program" means a nondisciplinary monitoring or practice remediation process applicable to a dentist or dental hygienist approved by a state licensing authority of a participating state in which the dentist or dental hygienist is licensed. This includes, but is not limited to, programs to which licensees with substance abuse or addiction issues are referred in lieu of adverse action.

(4) "Clinical assessment" means an examination or process, required for licensure as a dentist or dental hygienist as applicable, that provides evidence of clinical competence in dentistry or dental hygiene.

(5) "Commissioner" means the individual appointed by a participating state to serve as the member of the commission for that participating state.

(6) "Compact" means this dentist and dental hygienist compact.

(7) "Compact privilege" means the authorization granted by a remote state to allow a licensee from a participating state to practice as a dentist or dental hygienist in a remote state.

(8) "Continuing professional development" means a requirement, as a condition of license renewal, to provide evidence of successful participation in educational or professional activities relevant to practice or area of work.

(9) "Criminal background check" means the submission of fingerprints or other biometric-based information for a license applicant for the purpose of obtaining that applicant's criminal history record information, as defined in 28 C.F.R. Sec. 20.3(d) from the federal bureau of investigation and the state's criminal history record repository as defined in 28 C.F.R. Sec. 20.3(f).

(10) "Data system" means the commission's repository of information about licensees, including but not limited to examination, licensure, investigative, compact privilege, adverse action, and alternative program information.

(11) "Dental hygienist" means an individual who is licensed by a state licensing authority to practice dental hygiene.

(12) "Dentist" means an individual who is licensed by a state licensing authority to practice dentistry.

(13) "Dentist and dental hygienist compact commission" or "commission" means a joint government agency established by this compact comprised of each state that has enacted the compact and a national administrative body comprised of a commissioner from each state that has enacted the compact.

(14) "Encumbered license" means a license that a state licensing authority has limited in any way other than through an alternative program.

(15) "Executive board" means the chair, vice chair, secretary, treasurer, and any other commissioners as may be determined by commission rule or bylaw.

(16) "Jurisprudence requirement" means the assessment of an individual's knowledge of the laws and rules governing the practice of dentistry or dental hygiene, as applicable, in a state.

(17) "License" means current authorization by a state, other than authorization pursuant to a compact privilege or other privilege, for an individual to practice as a dentist or dental hygienist in that state.

(18) "Licensee" means an individual who holds an unrestricted license from a participating state to practice as a dentist or dental hygienist in that state.

(19) "Model compact" means the model for the dentist and dental hygienist compact on file with the council of state governments or other entity as designated by the commission.

(20) "Participating state" means a state that has enacted the compact and been admitted to the commission in accordance with the provisions herein and commission rules.

(21) "Qualifying license" means a license that is not an encumbered license issued by a participating state to practice dentistry or dental hygiene.

(22) "Remote state" means a participating state where a licensee who is not licensed as a dentist or dental hygienist is exercising or seeking to exercise the compact privilege.

(23) "Rule" means a regulation promulgated by an entity that has the force of law.

(24) "Scope of practice" means the procedures, actions, and processes a dentist or dental hygienist licensed in a state is permitted to undertake in that state and the circumstances under which the licensee is permitted to undertake those procedures, actions, and processes. Such procedures, actions, and processes and the circumstances under which they may be undertaken may be established through means including, but not limited to, statutes, regulations, case law, and other processes available to the state licensing authority or other government agency.

(25) "Significant investigative information" means information, records, and documents received or generated by a state licensing authority pursuant to an investigation for which a determination has been made that there is probable cause to believe that the licensee has violated a statute or regulation that is considered more than a minor infraction for which the state licensing authority could pursue adverse action against the licensee.

(26) "State" means any state, commonwealth, district, or territory of the United States of America that regulates the practices of dentistry and dental hygiene.

(27) "State licensing authority" means an agency or other entity of a state that is responsible for the licensing and regulation of dentists or dental hygienists.

[ 2023 c 297 s 2.]